Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5393XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5393XD (2) 91
as/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 124.204, subsection 4, Code 2026, is
amended by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. cq. Kratom, meaning any product or
ingredient containing any of the following:
(1) Any part of the leaf of the Mitragyna speciosa
plant if the plant contains the alkaloid mitragynine or
7-hydroxymitragynine.
(2) A synthetic material that contains the alkaloid
mitragynine or 7-hydroxymitragynine.